Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-176
Director of Correctional Services; designate place of confinement.

(1) Whenever any person is sentenced or committed under any provision of law to a specific facility within the department or to the custody of the warden or superintendent of such facility, he or she shall be deemed to be sentenced or committed to the department.

(2) The director may designate as a place of confinement of a person committed to the department any available, suitable, and appropriate residence facility or institution, whether or not operated by the state, and may at any time transfer such person from one place of confinement to another.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 7, p. 3075;

Laws 1973, LB 57, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 35;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 923.